Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 2. Alaska Historical Commission.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, §§ 40, 42.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 251, 259-262.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance protecting historical landmarks. 18 ALR4th 990.

Sec. 41.35.300.
Creation.

There is created in the department the Alaska Historical Commission.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987))

Sec. 41.35.310.
Composition of commission.

The Alaska Historical Commission consists of the following persons:

the lieutenant governor;

the state historic preservation officer appointed under 16 U.S.C. 470 — 470n (P.L. 89-665, National Historic Preservation Act of 1966);

three persons with professionally relevant backgrounds appointed from each of the following fields: history, architecture, and archeology;

one person appointed to represent indigenous ethnic groups;

two persons appointed from a list of recommended nominees, containing at least four names, submitted each year by the Alaska Historical Society;

one other person.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987); am E.O. No. 83 § 8 (1993); am § 32 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (2), substituted “historic preservation officer” for “liaison officer”.

Sec. 41.35.320.
Appointment of members.

Members of the commission are appointed by the governor and confirmed by the legislature meeting in joint session. The members of the commission serve at the pleasure of the governor.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987); am E.O. No. 83 § 9 (1993))

Sec. 41.35.330.
Term of office.

The term of office for a member of the commission is three years, except for those who are members by virtue of their positions with the state, who serve for as long as they remain in the position by virtue of which they are members of the commission. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the unexpired term of the member succeeded.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987); am E.O. No. 83 § 10 (1993); am § 16 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Sec. 41.35.340.
Compensation.

The members of the commission serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other boards and commissions.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987); am E.O. No. 83 § 11 (1993))

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 41.35.345.
Officers.

At the first meeting of each year, the commission shall elect a chair from among its members.

History.

(E.O. No. 83 § 12 (1993))

Sec. 41.35.347.
Meetings and quorum.

The commission shall meet at least twice a year. Additional meetings may be called by the chair or by petition of at least five members. Five members of the commission constitutes a quorum.

History.

(E.O. No. 83 § 12 (1993))

Sec. 41.35.350.
Duties of the commission.

The duties of the commission are to

survey, evaluate, and catalog Alaska prehistory and history materials now in print;

ascertain and register what Alaska prehistory and history work is now in progress;

identify the existing gaps in the coverage of Alaska’s past in presently available published works and establish priorities for bridging them;

prepare a thematic study of Alaska’s history for historic preservation;

identify the sources of Alaska’s history;

coordinate the production and publication of works that will adequately present all aspects of Alaska’s past;

cooperate with the federal government in programs relating to history and archaeology;

develop criteria for the evaluation of state monuments and historic sites and all real and personal property that may be considered to be of historic, prehistoric, or archeological significance as would justify their acquisition and ownership by the state;

cooperate with the department in formulating and administering a statewide historic sites survey under 16 U.S.C. 470-470n (P.L. 89-665, National Historic Preservation Act of 1966);

review those surveys and historic preservation plans that may be required, and approve properties for nomination to the National Register as provided for in 16 U.S.C. 470-470n (P.L. 89-665, National Historic Preservation Act of 1966);

provide necessary assistance to the governor and the legislature for achieving balanced and coordinated state policies and programs for the preservation of the state’s historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources;

consult with local historical district commissions regarding the establishment of historical districts under AS

29.55.010

—

29.55.020

and the approval of project alterations under AS

45.98.040

; recommend, if appropriate, the formulation of additional criteria for the designation of historical districts under AS

29.55.020(b)

; approve plans for and evaluate the suitability of specific structures for purposes of loan eligibility and continuance under the historical district revolving loan fund (AS 45.98); and consult with the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development relative to the adoption of regulations for historical district loans under AS 45.98;

determine the correct and most appropriate names of the lakes, streams, places, and other geographic features in the state and their spelling;

pass upon and give names to lakes, streams, places, and other geographic features in the state for which no single generally acceptable name has been in use;

cooperate with local subdivisions of government and, with their approval, change the names of lakes, streams, places, and other geographic features to eliminate duplication of names in the state;

prepare and publish an official state dictionary of geographic names and publish it for sale, either as a complete whole or in parts when ready; and

serve as the state representatives of the United States Board on Geographic Names and cooperate with that board so that there is no conflict between the state and federal designations of geographic features in the state.

In carrying out its duties to name geographic features under this section, the commission shall consider using Alaska Native place names for geographic features in the state that have not previously been named, using Native language writing systems accepted by the Alaska Native Language Center of the University of Alaska at Fairbanks.

When the commission gives a name to a lake, stream, place, or other geographic feature in the state, the name is the official name of the geographic feature and shall be used in all maps, records, documents, and other publications issued by the state or its departments and political subdivisions.

A person may not attempt to modify local usage or name an unnamed geographic feature in an advertisement or publication without first obtaining the approval of the commission. If a person violates this section, the commission shall promptly announce its disapproval and shall adopt an official name for the feature.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987); am E.O. No. 83 §§ 13, 14 (1993))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 41.35.360.
Reports. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 41.35.370.
Executive director. [Repealed, E.O. No. 83 § 20 (1993).]

Sec. 41.35.375.
Powers of chairman.

Subject to available appropriations, the chair may, with the concurrence of a majority of the commission, employ necessary personnel and may contract for the services of experts and other persons who may be needed.

History.

(E.O. No. 83 § 15 (1993))

Sec. 41.35.380.
Gifts and income.

There is established in the state general fund a special Alaska Historical Commission receipts account into which shall be paid:

all monetary gifts, grants, and bequests received by the commission;

all royalties and other income that the commission receives from its projects.

The legislature may appropriate funds from this account for commission projects.

History.

(E.O. No. 63 § 2 (1987))